Utah statutes.
34A-8a-101.   Title -- Intent statement.
(1)  This chapter is known as the "Utah Injured Worker Reemployment Act."
(2)  This chapter is intended to promote and monitor the state's and the
employer's capacity to assist the injured worker in returning to the work
force by evaluating the effectiveness of the voluntary efforts of employers
under this chapter.
